New York, session 2025-2026, A7218.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1303 of the real property actions and proceedings 2 law is amended by adding a new subdivision 3-b to read as follows: 3 3-b. (a) At the time the notice to any residential mortgagor required 4 by paragraph a of subdivision one of this section is delivered to the 5 mortgagor or the mortgagor's agent, the foreclosing party shall also 6 provide an offer to the mortgagor to refinance the mortgage. Such offer 7 shall be included with the summons and complaint at the time such docu- 8 ments are served upon the mortgagor or the mortgagor's agent. 9 (b) The refinancing offer described in paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 10 sion shall be an offer to refinance the mortgage at the lowest interest 11 rate offered by the foreclosing party within the thirty days prior to 12 the commencement of the foreclosure proceeding, and shall be irrespec- 13 tive of the borrower's credit rating, income, assets or payment history. 14 (c) A foreclosing party shall not be required to offer refinancing 15 pursuant to this subdivision more than one time in a foreclosure 16 proceeding or more than one time with respect to the same property while 17 the property is owned by the same mortgagor. 18 (d) The provisions of this subdivision shall only apply when the fore- 19 closing party is a bank or financial institution that offers mortgages 20 for residential real property as part of its regular course of business 21 and is the sole holder of the mortgage on the property. 22 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 23 have become a law and shall apply to all foreclosures on residential 24 properties commencing on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08028-01-5